tests/nouns_postpositions.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Postpositions from misc nouns": 
    ис<n><px3sg><dat> : иһигэр
    ис<n><px3sg><abl> : иһиттэн
    орто<n><px3sg><dat> : ортотугар
    орто<n><px3sg><abl> : ортотуттан
    атта<n><px3sg><dat> : аттыгар
    атта<n><px3sg><abl> : аттыттан
    инни<n><px2sg><dat> : иннигэр
    инни<n><abl> : инниттэн
    быыс<n><px3sg><dat> : быыһыгар
    быыс<n><px3sg><abl> : быыһыттан
    тус<n><px3sg><ins> : туһунан
    уст<n><px3sg><loc> : устата
    уст<n><px3sg><acc> : устун
    уст<n><px3sg><ins> : устунан
#Also check:
#	 төрдүгэр
#	 төрдүттэн

  "Postpositions from nouns with epenthesis issues":
    алын<n><px3sg><dat> : анныгар
    алын<n><px3sg><abl> : анныттан
    үрүт<n><px3sg><abl> : үрдүттэн
    үрүт<n><px3sg><dat> : үрдүгэр
    үрүт<n><px3sg><ins> : үрдүнэн
    кэлин<n><px3sg><abl> : кэнниттэн
    кэлин<n><px3sg><ins> : кэннинэн
    өрүт<n><px3sg><ins> : өттүнэн
    өрүт<n><px3sg><abl> : өттүттэн
    өрүт<n><px3sg><dat> : өттүгэр
    орун<n><px3sg><dat> : оннугар
